Connecticut, session 2026, HB05160.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of thirty-three million five
2 hundred thousand dollars is appropriated to the Department of
3 Housing from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
4 for programs to assist homeless persons.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HSG Joint Favorable
HB5160 / File No. 20 1

HB5160 File No. 20
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $
Department of Housing GF - Cost 33.5 million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill appropriates $33.5 million in FY 27 to the Department of
Housing and specifies that this funding be used for programs to assist
homeless persons.
The Out Years
None
HB5160 / File No. 20 2

HB5160 File No. 20
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5160
AN ACT APPROPRIATING FUNDS TO ASSIST HOMELESS
PERSONS.